test/src/morphology/N-МО_А-официант_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
Tests:
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Noun - официант M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      официант+N+Msc+Sg+Nom: официа́нт
      официант+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Anim: официа́нта
      официант+N+Msc+Sg+Gen: официа́нта
      официант+N+Msc+Sg+Loc: официа́нте
      официант+N+Msc+Sg+Dat: официа́нту
      официант+N+Msc+Sg+Ins: официа́нтом
      официант+N+Msc+Pl+Nom: официа́нты
      официант+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Anim: официа́нтов
      официант+N+Msc+Pl+Gen: официа́нтов
      официант+N+Msc+Pl+Loc: официа́нтах
      официант+N+Msc+Pl+Dat: официа́нтам
      официант+N+Msc+Pl+Ins: официа́нтами
